Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-411
Campus buildings and facilities; board; powers.

The boards are hereby authorized and empowered to do any and all things necessary and convenient to carry out the purposes and intent of sections 85-403 to 85-411.

Laws 1955, c. 352, § 9, p. 1078.